California statutes. Civil Code
(1) The trespass was committed by a defendant who either himself procured, or whose principal, lessor, or immediate predecessor in title procured the survey to be made; and

(2) The survey was made by a person licensed under the laws of this State to practice land surveying.

(c) Any action
 for the damages specified by subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section must be commenced within five years from the date of the trespass.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2346.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Provisions [3353. - 3361.]

3353.

In estimating damages, the value of property to a seller thereof is deemed to be the price which he could have obtained therefor in the market nearest to the place at which it should have been accepted by the buyer, and at such time after the breach of the contract as would have sufficed, with reasonable diligence, for the seller to effect a resale.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3354.

In estimating damages, except as provided by Sections 3355 and 3356, the value of property, to a buyer or owner thereof, deprived of its possession, is deemed to be the price at which he might have bought an equivalent thing in the market nearest to the place where the property ought to have been put into his possession, and at such time after the breach of duty upon which his right to damages is founded as would suffice, with reasonable diligence, for him to make such a purchase.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3355.

Where certain property has a peculiar value to a person recovering damages for deprivation thereof, or injury thereto, that may be deemed to be its value against one who had notice thereof before incurring a liability to damages in respect thereof, or against a willful wrongdoer.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[3356.]

Section Thirty-three Hundred and Fifty-six. For the purpose of estimating damages, the value of an instrument in writing is presumed to be equal to that of the property to which it entitles its owner.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

3357.

The damages prescribed by this Chapter are exclusive of exemplary damages and interest, except where those are expressly mentioned.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3358.

Except as expressly provided by statute, no person can recover a greater amount in damages for the breach of an obligation, than he could have gained by the full performance thereof on both sides.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 198.)
-------------------------------------------

3359.

Damages must, in all cases, be reasonable, and where an obligation of any kind appears to create a right to unconscionable and grossly oppressive damages, contrary to substantial justice, no more than reasonable damages can be recovered.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3360.

When a breach of duty has caused no appreciable detriment to the party affected, he may yet recover nominal damages.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3361.

Estimations, measures, or calculations of past, present, or future damages for lost earnings or impaired earning capacity resulting from personal injury or wrongful death shall not be reduced based on race, ethnicity, or gender.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 136, Sec. 2.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 3. SPECIFIC AND PREVENTIVE RELIEF [3366. - 3424.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Principles [3366. - 3369.]

3366.

Specific or preventive relief may be given as provided by the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 465.)
-------------------------------------------

3367.

Specific relief is given:

1. By taking possession of a thing, and delivering it to a claimant;

2. By compelling a party himself to do that which ought to be done; or,

3. By declaring and determining the rights of parties, otherwise than by an award of damages.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3368.

Preventive relief is given by prohibiting a party from doing that which ought not to be done.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3369.

Neither specific nor preventive relief can be granted to enforce a penalty or forfeiture in any case, nor to enforce a penal law, except in a case of nuisance or as otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Investment Advisers [3372. - 3372.]

3372.

(a) Any person engaged in the business of advising others for compensation as to the advisability of purchasing, holding or selling property for investment and who represents himself or herself to be an expert with respect to investment decisions in such property, or any class of such property, shall be liable to any person to whom such advisory services are furnished for compensation and who is damaged by reason of such person’s reliance upon such services, for the amount of such compensation and for such damages, unless the person
rendering such services proves that such services were performed with the due care and skill reasonably to be expected of a person who is such an expert.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following apply:

(1) A person represents that such person is an “expert” within the meaning of this section if such person represents that he or she is a “financial planner,” “financial adviser,” “financial counselor,” “financial consultant” or an “investment adviser,” “investment counselor” or “investment consultant” or that such person renders “financial planning services,” “financial advisory services,” “financial counseling services,” “financial consulting services” or “investment advisory services,” “investment counseling services” or “investment consulting services” or makes substantially equivalent representations with respect to such person’s business or qualifications.

(2) “Person” includes an individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, an association, joint stock company, a trust or unincorporated association.

(c) The following persons are not liable under the provisions of this section:

(1) Any person, when engaged in the purchase or sale of tangible personal property for his or her own account, and the agents and employees of such persons. 

(2) Any person, and the agents and employees of such person, licensed under, exempted from licensing under, or not subject to licensing under by reason of an express exclusion from a definition contained in, the Commodity Exchange Act, the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, the California Commodity Law, the Corporate Securities Law of 1968, the
Insurance Code, the Real Estate Law, or any state or federal law for the licensing and regulation of banks or savings and loan associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Specific Relief [3375. - 3415.]



  ARTICLE 1. Possession of Real Property [3375. - 3375.]

3375.

A person entitled to specific real property, by reason either of a perfected title, or of a claim to title which ought to be perfected, may recover the same in the manner prescribed by the Code of Civil Procedure, either by a judgment for its possession, to be executed by the Sheriff, or by a judgment requiring the other party to perfect the title, and to deliver possession of the property.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Possession of Personal Property [3379. - [3380.]]

3379.

A person entitled to the immediate possession of specific personal property may recover the same in the manner provided by the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[3380.]

Section Thirty-three Hundred and Eighty. Any person having the possession or control of a particular article of personal property, of which he is not the owner, may be compelled specifically to deliver it to the person entitled to its immediate possession.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Specific Performance of Obligations [[3384.] - 3395.]

[3384.]

Section Thirty-three Hundred and Eighty-four. Except as otherwise provided in this Article, the specific performance of an obligation may be compelled.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

3386.

Notwithstanding that the agreed counterperformance is not or would not have been specifically enforceable, specific performance may be compelled if:

(a) Specific performance would otherwise be an appropriate remedy; and

(b) The agreed counterperformance has been substantially performed or its concurrent or future performance is assured or, if the court deems necessary, can be secured to the satisfaction of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

3387.

It is to be presumed that the breach of an agreement to transfer real property cannot be adequately relieved by pecuniary compensation. In the case of a single-family dwelling which the party seeking performance intends to occupy, this presumption is conclusive. In all other cases, this presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 937, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3388.

A party who has signed a written contract may be compelled specifically to perform it, though the other party has not signed it, if the latter has performed, or offers to perform it on his part, and the case is otherwise proper for enforcing specific performance.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3389.

A contract otherwise proper to be specifically enforced, may be thus enforced, though a penalty is imposed, or the damages are liquidated for its breach, and the party in default is willing to pay the same.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3390.

The following obligations cannot be specifically enforced:

(a) An obligation to render personal service.

(b) An obligation to employ another in personal service.

(c) An agreement to perform an act which the party has not power
 lawfully to perform when required to do so.

(d) An agreement to procure the act or consent of the spouse of the contracting party, or of any other third person.

(e) An agreement, the terms of which are not sufficiently certain to make the precise act which is to be done clearly ascertainable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 12.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3391.

Specific performance cannot be enforced against a party to a contract in any of the following cases:

1. If he has not received an adequate consideration for the contract;

2. If it is not, as to him, just and reasonable;

3. If his assent was obtained by the misrepresentation, concealment, circumvention, or unfair practices of any party to whom performance would become due under the contract, or by any promise of such party which has not been substantially fulfilled; or;

4. If his assent was given under the influence of mistake, misapprehension, or surprise, except that where the contract provides for compensation in case of mistake, a mistake within the scope of such provision may be compensated for, and the contract specifically enforced in other respects, if proper to be so enforced.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3392.

Specific performance cannot be enforced in favor of a party who has not fully and fairly performed all the conditions precedent on his part to the obligation of the other party, except where his failure to perform is only partial, and either entirely immaterial, or capable of being fully compensated, in which case specific performance may be compelled, upon full compensation being made for the default.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3394.

An agreement for the sale of property cannot be specifically enforced in favor of a seller who cannot give to the buyer a title free from reasonable doubt.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3395.

Whenever an obligation in respect to real property would be specifically enforced against a particular person, it may be in like manner enforced against any other person claiming under him by a title created subsequently to the obligation, except a purchaser or incumbrancer in good faith and for value, and except, also, that any such person may exonerate himself by conveying all his estate to the person entitled to enforce the obligation.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Revision of Contracts [3399. - 3402.]

3399.

When, through fraud or a mutual mistake of the parties, or a mistake of one party, which the other at the time knew or suspected, a written contract does not truly express the intention of the parties, it may be revised on the application of a party aggrieved, so as to express that intention, so far as it can be done without prejudice to rights acquired by third persons, in good faith and for value.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3400.

For the purpose of revising a contract, it must be presumed that all the parties thereto intended to make an equitable and conscientious agreement.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3401.

In revising a written instrument, the Court may inquire what the instrument was intended to mean, and what were intended to be its legal consequences, and is not confined to the inquiry what the language of the instrument was intended to be.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3402.

A contract may be first revised and then specifically enforced.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Cancellation of Instruments [3412. - 3415.]

3412.

A written instrument, in respect to which there is a reasonable apprehension that if left outstanding it may cause serious injury to a person against whom it is void or voidable, may, upon his application, be so adjudged, and ordered to be delivered up or canceled.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3413.

An instrument, the invalidity of which is apparent upon its face, or upon the face of another instrument which is necessary to the use of the former in evidence, is not to be deemed capable of causing injury, within the provisions of the last section.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3414.

Where an instrument is evidence of different rights or obligations, it may be canceled in part, and allowed to stand for the residue.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3415.

(a) An action may be maintained by any person interested in any private document or instrument in writing, which has been lost or destroyed, to prove or establish the document or instrument or to compel the issuance, execution, and acknowledgment of a duplicate of the document or instrument.

(b) If the document or instrument is a negotiable instrument, the court shall compel the owner of the negotiable instrument to give an indemnity bond to the person reissuing,
 reexecuting, or reacknowledging the same, against loss, damage, expense, or other liability that may be suffered by the person by reason of the issuance of the duplicate instrument or by the original instrument still remaining outstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Preventive Relief [3420. - 3424.]

3420.

Preventive relief is granted by injunction, provisional or final.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3421.

Provisional injunctions are regulated by the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3422.

Except where otherwise provided by this Title, a final injunction may be granted to prevent the breach of an obligation existing in favor of the applicant:

1. Where pecuniary compensation would not afford adequate relief;

2. Where it would be extremely difficult to ascertain the amount of compensation which would afford adequate relief;

3. Where the restraint is necessary to prevent a multiplicity of judicial proceedings; or,

4. Where the obligation arises from a trust.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

3423.

An injunction may not be granted:

(a) To stay a judicial proceeding pending at the commencement of the action in which the injunction is demanded, unless this restraint is necessary to prevent a multiplicity of proceedings.

(b) To stay proceedings in a court of the United States.

(c) To stay proceedings in another state upon a judgment of a court of that state.

(d) To prevent the execution of a public statute, by officers of the law, for the public benefit.

(e) To prevent the breach of a contract the performance of which would not be specifically enforced, other than a contract in writing for the rendition of personal services from one to another where the promised service is of a special, unique, unusual, extraordinary, or intellectual character, which gives it peculiar value, the loss of which cannot be reasonably or adequately compensated in damages in an action at law, and where the compensation for the personal services is as follows:

(1) As to contracts entered into on or before December 31, 1993, the minimum compensation provided in the contract for the personal services shall be at the rate of six thousand dollars ($6,000) per annum.

(2) As to contracts entered into on or after January 1, 1994, the criteria of subparagraph (A) or (B), as follows, are satisfied:

(A) The compensation is as follows:

(i) The minimum compensation provided in the contract shall be at the rate of nine thousand dollars ($9,000) per annum for the first year of the contract, twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per annum for the second year of the contract, and fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per annum for the third to seventh years, inclusive, of the contract.

(ii) In addition, after the third year of the contract, there shall actually have been paid for the services through and including the contract year during which the injunctive relief is sought, over and above the minimum contractual compensation
specified in clause (i), the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per annum during the fourth and fifth years of the contract, and thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per annum during the sixth and seventh years of the contract. As a condition to petitioning for an injunction, amounts payable under this clause may be paid at any time prior to seeking injunctive relief.

(B) The aggregate compensation actually received for the services provided under a contract that does not meet the criteria of subparagraph (A), is at least 10 times the applicable aggregate minimum amount specified in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) through and including the contract year during which the injunctive relief is sought. As a condition to petitioning for an injunction, amounts payable under this subparagraph may be paid at any time prior to seeking injunctive relief.

(3) Compensation
paid in any contract year in excess of the minimums specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) shall apply to reduce the compensation otherwise required to be paid under those provisions in any subsequent contract years.

However, an injunction may be granted to prevent the breach of a contract entered into between any nonprofit cooperative corporation or association and a member or stockholder thereof in respect to any provision regarding the sale or delivery to the corporation or association of the products produced or acquired by the member or stockholder.

(f) To prevent the exercise of a public or private office, in a lawful manner, by the person in possession.

(g) To prevent a legislative act by a municipal corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 836, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3424.

(a) Upon notice and motion, the court may modify or dissolve a final injunction upon a showing that there has been a material change in the facts upon which the injunction was granted, that the law upon which the injunction was granted has changed, or that the ends of justice would be served by the modification or dissolution of the injunction.

(b) Service of this motion to modify or dissolve a final injunction shall be made upon the nonmoving party by one of the following
methods:

(1) If the party has not appeared in the action, the motion shall be served in the same manner as a summons pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) If the party has appeared in the action, the motion shall be served either upon the party or his or her attorney, or upon the party if he or she has appeared without an attorney, either in the same manner as a summons pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of the Code of Civil Procedure or in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1010) of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) This section does not apply to a final injunction issued pursuant to the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 796, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 4. UNIFORM SINGLE PUBLICATION ACT [3425.1. - 3425.5.]

3425.1.

This title may be cited as the Uniform Single Publication Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

3425.2.

This act shall be so interpreted as to effectuate its purpose to make uniform the law of those states or jurisdictions which enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

3425.3.

No person shall have more than one cause of action for damages for libel or slander or invasion of privacy or any other tort founded upon any single publication or exhibition or utterance, such as any one issue of a newspaper or book or magazine or any one presentation to an audience or any one broadcast over radio or television or any one exhibition of a motion picture. Recovery in any action shall include all damages for any such tort suffered by the plaintiff in all jurisdictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

3425.4.

A judgment in any jurisdiction for or against the plaintiff upon the substantive merits of any action for damages founded upon a single publication or exhibition or utterance as described in Section 3425.3 shall bar any other action for damages by the same plaintiff against the same defendant founded upon the same publication or exhibition or utterance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

3425.5.

This title shall not be retroactive as to causes of action existing on its effective date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 5. UNIFORM TRADE SECRETS ACT [3426. - 3426.11.]

3426.

This title may be cited as the Uniform Trade Secrets Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1724, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.1.

As used in this title, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “Improper means” includes theft, bribery, misrepresentation, breach or inducement of a breach of a duty to maintain secrecy, or espionage through electronic or other means. Reverse engineering or independent derivation alone shall not be considered improper means.

(b) “Misappropriation” means:

(1) Acquisition of a trade secret of another by a person who knows or has reason to know that the trade secret was acquired by improper means; or

(2) Disclosure or use of a trade secret of another without express or implied consent by a person who:

(A) Used improper means to acquire knowledge of the trade secret; or

(B) At the time of disclosure or use, knew or had reason to know that his or her knowledge of the trade secret was:

(i) Derived from or through a person who had utilized improper means to acquire it;

(ii) Acquired under circumstances giving rise to a duty to maintain its secrecy or limit its use; or

(iii) Derived from or through a person who owed a duty to the person seeking relief to maintain its secrecy or limit its use; or

(C) Before a material change of his or her position, knew or had reason to know that it was a trade secret and that knowledge of it had been acquired by accident or mistake.

(c) “Person” means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(d) “Trade secret” means information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process, that:

(1) Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being
 generally known to the public or to other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use; and

(2) Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.2.

(a) Actual or threatened misappropriation may be enjoined. Upon application to the court, an injunction shall be terminated when the trade secret has ceased to exist, but the injunction may be continued for an additional period of time in order to eliminate commercial advantage that otherwise would be derived from the misappropriation.

(b) If the court determines that it would be unreasonable to prohibit future use, an injunction may condition future use upon payment of a reasonable royalty for no longer than the period of time the use could have been prohibited.

(c) In appropriate circumstances, affirmative acts to protect a trade secret may be compelled by court order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1724, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.3.

(a) A complainant may recover damages for the actual loss caused by misappropriation. A complainant also may recover for the unjust enrichment caused by misappropriation that is not taken into account in computing damages for actual loss.

(b) If neither damages nor unjust enrichment caused by misappropriation are provable, the court may order payment of a reasonable royalty for no longer than the period of time the use could have been prohibited.

(c) If willful and malicious misappropriation exists, the
 court may award exemplary damages in an amount not exceeding twice any award made under subdivision (a) or (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1724, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.4.

If a claim of misappropriation is made in bad faith, a motion to terminate an injunction is made or resisted in bad faith, or willful and malicious misappropriation exists, the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing party. Recoverable costs hereunder shall include a reasonable sum to cover the services of expert witnesses, who are not regular employees of any party, actually incurred and reasonably necessary in either, or both, preparation for trial or arbitration, or during trial or arbitration, of the case by the prevailing
 party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.5.

In an action under this title, a court shall preserve the secrecy of an alleged trade secret by reasonable means, which may include granting protective orders in connection with discovery proceedings, holding in-camera hearings, sealing the records of the action, and ordering any person involved in the litigation not to disclose an alleged trade secret without prior court approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1724, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.6.

An action for misappropriation must be brought within three years after the misappropriation is discovered or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have been discovered. For the purposes of this section, a continuing misappropriation constitutes a single claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1724, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.7.

(a) Except as otherwise expressly provided, this title does not supersede any statute relating to misappropriation of a trade secret, or any statute otherwise regulating trade secrets.

(b) This title does not affect (1) contractual remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret, (2) other civil remedies that are not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret, or (3) criminal remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret.

(c) This title does not affect the disclosure of a record by a state or local agency under the California Public Records
 Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the
 Government Code). Any determination as to whether the disclosure of a record under the California Public Records Act constitutes a misappropriation of a trade secret and the rights and remedies with respect thereto shall be made pursuant to the law in effect before the operative date of this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 52.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.8.

This title shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this title among states enacting it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1724, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.9.

If any provision of this title or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1724, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.10.

This title does not apply to misappropriation occurring prior to January 1, 1985. If a continuing misappropriation otherwise covered by this title began before January 1, 1985, this title does not apply to the part of the misappropriation occurring before that date. This title does apply to the part of the misappropriation occurring on or after that date unless the appropriation was not a misappropriation under the law in effect before the operative date of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1724, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3426.11.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 47, in any legislative or judicial proceeding, or in any other official proceeding authorized by law, or in the initiation or course of any other proceeding authorized by law and reviewable pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1084) of Title 1 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the voluntary, intentional disclosure of trade secret information, unauthorized by its owner, to a competitor or potential competitor of the owner of the trade secret information or the agent or representative of such a
 competitor or potential competitor is not privileged and is not a privileged communication for purposes of Part 2 (commencing with Section 43) of Division 1.

This section does not in any manner limit, restrict, impair, or otherwise modify either the application of the other subdivisions of Section 47 to the conduct to which this section applies or the court’s authority to control, order, or permit access to evidence in any case before it.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, restrict, or otherwise impair, the capacity of persons employed by public entities to report improper government activity, as defined in Section 10542 of the Government Code, or the capacity of private persons to report improper activities of a private business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 6. INTERFERENCE WITH ACCESS TO HEALTH CARE [3427. - 3427.4.]

3427.

As used in this title:

(a) “Aggrieved” means and refers to any of the following persons or entities:

(1) A person physically present at a health care facility when a commercial blockade occurs whose access is obstructed or impeded.

(2) A person physically present at a health care facility when a commercial blockade occurs whose health care is disrupted.

(3) A health care facility where a commercial blockade occurs, its employees, contractors, or volunteers.

(4) The owner of a health care facility where a commercial blockade occurs or of the building or property upon which the health care facility is located.

(b) “Commercial blockade” means acts constituting the tort of commercial blockade, as defined in Section 3427.1.

(c) “Disrupting the normal functioning of a health care facility” means intentionally rendering or attempting to render a health care facility temporarily or permanently unavailable or unusable by a licensed health practitioner, the facility’s staff, or patients. “Disrupting the normal functioning of a health care facility” does not include acts of the owner of the facility, an agent acting
 on behalf of the owner, or officers or employees of a governmental entity acting to protect the public health or safety.

(d) “Health care facility” means a facility that provides health care services directly to patients, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, licensed health practitioner’s office, health maintenance organization, diagnostic or treatment center, neuropsychiatric or mental health facility, hospice, or nursing home.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1193, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3427.1.

It is unlawful, and constitutes the tort of commercial blockade for a person, alone or in concert with others, to intentionally prevent an individual from entering or exiting a health care facility by physically obstructing the individual’s passage or by disrupting the normal functioning of a health care facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1193, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3427.2.

A person or health care facility aggrieved by the actions prohibited by this title may seek civil damages from those who committed the prohibited acts and those acting in concert with them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3427.3.

The court having jurisdiction over a civil proceeding under this title shall take all steps reasonably necessary to safeguard the individual privacy and prevent harassment of a health care patient, licensed health practitioner, or employee, client, or customer of a health care facility who is a party or witness in the proceeding, including granting protective orders. Health care patients, licensed health practitioners, and employees, clients, and customers of the health care facility may use pseudonyms to protect their privacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1193, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3427.4.

This title shall not be construed to impair any constitutionally protected activity or any activities protected by the labor laws of this state or the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1193, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 7. DUTY OF HEALTH CARE SERVICE PLANS AND MANAGED CARE ENTITIES [3428. - 3428.]

3428.

(a) For services rendered on or after January 1, 2001, a health care service plan or managed care entity, as described in subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, shall have a duty of ordinary care to arrange for the provision of medically necessary health care service to its subscribers and enrollees, where the health care service is a benefit provided under the plan, and shall be liable for any and all harm legally caused by its failure to exercise that ordinary care when both of the following apply:

(1) The failure to exercise ordinary care resulted in the denial, delay, or modification of the health care service recommended for, or furnished to, a subscriber or enrollee.

(2) The subscriber or enrollee suffered substantial harm.

(b) For purposes of this section: (1) substantial harm means loss of life, loss or significant impairment of limb or bodily function, significant disfigurement, severe and chronic physical pain, or significant financial loss; (2) health care services need not be recommended or furnished by an in-plan provider, but may be recommended or furnished by any health care provider practicing within the scope of his or her practice; and (3) health care services shall be recommended or furnished at any time prior to the inception of the action, and the recommendation need not be made prior to the
 occurrence of substantial harm.

(c) Health care service plans and managed care entities are not health care providers under any provision of law, including, but not limited to, Section 6146 of the Business and Professions Code, Sections 3333.1 or 3333.2 of this code, or Sections 340.5, 364, 425.13, 667.7, or 1295 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) A health care service plan or managed care entity shall not seek indemnity, whether contractual or equitable, from a provider for liability imposed under subdivision (a). Any provision to the contrary in a contract with providers is void and unenforceable.

(e) This section shall not create any liability on the part of an employer or an employer group purchasing organization that purchases coverage or assumes risk on behalf of its employees or on behalf of self-funded
 employee benefit plans.

(f) Any waiver by a subscriber or enrollee of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and void.

(g) This section does not create any new or additional liability on the part of a health care service plan or managed care entity for harm caused that is attributable to the medical negligence of a treating physician or other treating health care provider.

(h) This section does not abrogate or limit any other theory of liability otherwise available at law.

(i) This section shall not apply in instances where subscribers or enrollees receive treatment by prayer, consistent with the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 1270 of the Health and Safety Code, in lieu of medical treatment.

(j) Damages recoverable for a violation of this section include, but are not limited to, those set forth in Section 3333.
